intl/locales/te/hyphenation/hyph_te.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
2‍2
1‌1
అ1
ఆ1
ఇ1
ఈ1
ఉ1
ఊ1
ఋ1
ౠ1
ఌ1
ౡ1
ఎ1
ఏ1
ఐ1
ఒ1
ఓ1
ఔ1
ా1
ి1
ీ1
ు1
ూ1
ృ1
ౄ1
ె1
ే1
ై1
ొ1
ో1
ౌ1
1క
1ఖ
1గ
1ఘ
1ఙ
1చ
1ఛ
1జ
1ఝ
1ఞ
1ట
1ఠ
1డ
1ఢ
1ణ
1త
1థ
1ద
1ధ
1న
1ప
1ఫ
1బ
1భ
1మ
1య
1ర
1ఱ
1ల
1ళ
1వ
1శ
1ష
1స
1హ
2ఁ1
2ం1
2ః1
2ౕ1
2ౖ1
2్2
